Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-411.01
Apportionment of benefits; report; filing; notice; publication.

The directors, having adopted the apportionment method of financing and having completed the apportionment of benefits, shall make a detailed report of the same and file such report with the county clerk. Thereupon the board of directors shall cause to be published, once each week for three consecutive weeks, in a newspaper of general circulation in the district, a copy of the apportionment and a statement of the total number of units of benefit in the district.

Laws 1969, c. 245, § 3, p. 897.